test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-09likw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Adjective - likõ: # Adjective (9) likõ 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     likõ+A+Sg+Nom: likõ
     likõ+A+Sg+Gen: kibõna
     likõ+A+Sg+Par: kibõnat
     likõ+A+Sg+Ill: kibõnahe
     likõ+A+Sg+Ine: kibõnan
     likõ+A+Sg+Ela: kibõnast
     likõ+A+Sg+All: kibõnalõ
     likõ+A+Sg+Ade: kibõnal
     likõ+A+Sg+Abl: kibõnalt
     likõ+A+Sg+Tra: kibõnas
     likõ+A+Sg+Ter: kibõnaniq
     likõ+A+Sg+Abe: kibõnaldaq
     likõ+A+Sg+Com: kibõnagaq
     likõ+A+Pl+Nom: kibõnaq
     likõ+A+Pl+Gen: kibõnidõ
     likõ+A+Pl+Par: kibõnit
     likõ+A+Pl+Ill: kibõnihe
     likõ+A+Pl+Ine: kibõnin
     likõ+A+Pl+Ela: kibõnist
     likõ+A+Pl+All: kibõnilõ
     likõ+A+Pl+Ade: kibõnil
     likõ+A+Pl+Abl: kibõnilt
     likõ+A+Pl+Tra: kibõnis
     likõ+A+Pl+Ter: kibõniniq
     likõ+A+Pl+Abe: kibõnildaq
     likõ+A+Pl+Com: kibõnidõgaq
